Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1534.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "tax credit" in section 1701-A.1 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended to read:Section 1701-A.1. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *<--<--1234567891011121314151617181920212223 "Tax credit." A tax credit authorized under any of the following:(1) Article XVII-B.(2) Article XVII-D.(3) Article XVII-E.(4) Article XVII-G.(5) Article XVII-H.(6) Article XVII-I.(7) Article XVII-J.(8) Article XVII-K.(8.1) Article XVII-L.(9) Article XVIII.(10) Article XVIII-B.(11) Article XVIII-D.(12) Article XVIII-E.(13) Article XVIII-F.(14) Article XVIII-G.(14.1) Article XVIII-H.(15) Article XIX-A.(15.1) Article XIX-C.(16) Article XIX-E.(16.1) Article XIX-F.(16.2) Article XIX-I.(17) Section 2010.(19) Article XX-B of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949.(20) The act of December 1, 2004 (P.L.1750, No.226), known as the First Class Cities Economic Development District Act.(21) 12 Pa.C.S. Ch. 34 (relating to Infrastructure and 20250HB1534PN1879 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Facilities Improvement Program).(22) Any other program established by a law of this Commonwealth in which a person applies for and receives a credit against a tax. This paragraph shall not apply to a credit against a tax liability as a result of an overpayment.* * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XIX-IPENNSYLVANIA CHILD AND DEPENDENTCARE ENHANCEMENT TAX CREDIT PROGRAMSection 1901-I. Scope of article.This article relates to the Pennsylvania Child and Dependent Care Enhancement Tax Credit Program.Section 1902-I. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Applicable percent." As defined in section 21(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 in effect for the taxable year beginning after December 31, 2021, and ending before January 1, 2023."Department." The Department of Revenue of the Commonwealth."Employment-related expenses." As defined in section 21(b)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986."Internal Revenue Code of 1986." The Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (Public Law 99-514, 26 U.S.C. § 1 et seq.)."Qualifying individual." As defined in section 21(b)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986."Resident individual." An individual who:(1) is domiciled in this Commonwealth, unless the 20250HB1534PN1879 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 individual maintains no permanent place of abode in this Commonwealth and maintains a permanent place of abode elsewhere and spends in the aggregate no more than 30 days of the taxable year in this Commonwealth; or(2) is not domiciled in this Commonwealth, but maintains a permanent place of abode in this Commonwealth and spends in the aggregate more than 183 days of the taxable year in this Commonwealth."Tax credit." A tax credit provided for under this article."Tax liability." The liability for taxes imposed under Article III, excluding any tax withheld by an employer under Article III."Taxable year." As defined in section 301."Taxpayer." A resident individual subject to the tax imposed under Article III.Section 1903-I. Credit for child and dependent care employment-related expenses.(a) Tax credit.--For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2021, a taxpayer who receives a credit under section 21 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 may claim a tax credit against the taxpayer's tax liability.(b) Amount of tax credit.--The amount of the tax credit under this section for the taxable year beginning after December 31, 2021, and ending before January 1, 2023, shall be equal to 30% of:(1) the actual amount of employment-related expenses incurred by the taxpayer and claimed for the Federal tax credit under section 21 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 during the prior taxable year or the following, as applicable, whichever is less:20250HB1534PN1879 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) $3,000 for one qualifying individual with respect to the taxpayer; or(ii) $6,000 for two or more qualifying individuals with respect to the taxpayer; multiplied by(2) the applicable percent, with respect to the taxpayer, in effect for the taxable year beginning after December 31, 2021, and ending before January 1, 2023.(c) Amount of tax credit in subsequent taxable years.--The amount of the tax credit under this section for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2022, and for each taxable year thereafter, shall be equal to 100% of:(1) the actual amount of employment-related expenses incurred by the taxpayer and claimed for the Federal tax credit under section 21 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 during the prior taxable year or the following, as applicable, whichever is less:(i) $3,000 for one qualifying individual with respect to the taxpayer; or(ii) $6,000 for two or more qualifying individuals with respect to the taxpayer; multiplied by(2) the applicable percent, with respect to the taxpayer, in effect for the taxable year beginning after December 31, 2021, and ending before January 1, 2023.(d) Claim of tax credit.--A taxpayer must claim the tax credit under this section on a return filed under section 330.(e) Applicability of tax credit.--The tax credit under this section shall be applied against the taxpayer's tax liability. If the tax credit exceeds the taxpayer's tax liability, the department may issue a refund under the procedures specified in section 346.20250HB1534PN1879 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 1904-I. Alternate credit for child and dependent care employment-related expenses.(a) Tax credit.--For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024, a taxpayer who did not receive a credit under section 21 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 but participated in a dependent care assistance program under section 129 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 may claim a tax credit against the taxpayer's tax liability.(b) Amount of tax credit.--The amount of the tax credit under this section shall be equal to 100% of:(1) the actual amount of dependent care assistance received by the taxpayer and claimed under section 129 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 during the prior taxable year or the following, as applicable, whichever is less:(i) $3,000 for one dependent with respect to the taxpayer; or(ii) $6,000 for two or more dependents with respect to the taxpayer; multiplied by(2) the applicable percent that would have applied to the taxpayer had they received a credit under section 21 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 in effect for the taxable year beginning after December 31, 2021, and ending before January 1, 2023.(c) Claim of tax credit.--A taxpayer must claim a tax credit under this section on a return filed under section 330.(d) Applicability of tax credit.--The tax credit under this section shall be applied against the taxpayer's tax liability. If the tax credit exceeds the taxpayer's tax liability, the department may issue a refund under the procedures specified in section 346.20250HB1534PN1879 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 1905-I Prohibitions.A taxpayer may not:(1) carry over, carry back or sell, assign or transfer the tax credit; and(2) claim the tax credit for the same employment-related expenses used to claim the tax credit on a return filed by another taxpayer.Section 1906-I. Application of Internal Revenue Code of 1986.The provisions of section 21 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 in effect as of July 8, 2022, and any Federal regulations promulgated regarding those provisions, shall apply to the department's interpretation and administration of the tax credit.Section 1907-I. Administration of article.The department may jointly administer this article with other provisions of this act, including joint reporting of information, forms, returns, statements, documents or other information submitted to the department.Section 1908-I. Departmental duties.The department shall publish guidelines and may promulgate regulations as necessary for the implementation and administration of this article.Section 1909-I. Report to General Assembly.(a) Annual report.--Each March 1, the department shall submit a report to the General Assembly indicating the effectiveness of the tax credit.(b) Information required.--The report required under subsection (a) shall include, but not be limited to, the following information:(1) The number of tax credits approved.20250HB1534PN1879 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) The amount of tax credits approved.(3) The amount of tax credits claimed.(4) The amount of tax credits refunded.SECTION 3. REPEALS ARE AS FOLLOWS:(1) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY DECLARES THAT THE REPEAL UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) IS NECESSARY TO EFFECTUATE THE AMENDMENT OF SECTION 1701-A.1 AND THE ADDITION OF ARTICLE XIX-I OF THE ACT OF MARCH 4, 1971 (P.L.6, NO.2), KNOWN AS THE TAX REFORM CODE OF 1971.(2) ARTICLE XVI-W OF THE ACT OF APRIL 9, 1929 (P.L.343, NO.176), KNOWN AS THE FISCAL CODE, IS REPEALED.SECTION 4. THE ADDITION OF ARTICLE XIX-I OF THE ACT OF MARCH 4, 1971 (P.L.6, NO.2), KNOWN AS THE TAX REFORM CODE OF 1971, IS A CONTINUATION OF ARTICLE XVI-W OF THE ACT OF APRIL 9, 1929 (P.L.343, NO.176), KNOWN AS THE FISCAL CODE. THE FOLLOWING APPLY:(1) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN ARTICLE XIX-I OF THE TAX REFORM CODE OF 1971, ALL ACTIVITIES INITIATED UNDER ARTICLE XVI-W OF THE FISCAL CODE SHALL CONTINUE AND REMAIN IN FULL FORCE AND EFFECT AND MAY BE COMPLETED UNDER ARTICLE XIX-I OF THE TAX REFORM CODE OF 1971. ORDERS, REGULATIONS, RULES AND DECISIONS WHICH WERE MADE UNDER ARTICLE XVI-W OF THE FISCAL CODE AND WHICH ARE IN EFFECT ON THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SECTION SHALL REMAIN IN FULL FORCE AND EFFECT UNTIL REVOKED, VACATED OR MODIFIED UNDER ARTICLE XIX-I OF THE TAX REFORM CODE OF 1971. CONTRACTS AND OBLIGATIONS ENTERED INTO UNDER ARTICLE XVI-W OF THE FISCAL CODE ARE NOT AFFECTED NOR IMPAIRED BY THE REPEAL OF ARTICLE XVI-W OF THE FISCAL CODE.(2) EXCEPT AS SET FORTH IN PARAGRAPH (3), ANY DIFFERENCE IN LANGUAGE BETWEEN ARTICLE XIX-I OF THE TAX REFORM CODE OF 20250HB1534PN1879 - 8 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 1971 AND ARTICLE XVI-W OF THE FISCAL CODE IS INTENDED ONLY TO CONFORM TO THE STYLE OF THE TAX REFORM CODE OF 1971 AND IS NOT INTENDED TO CHANGE OR AFFECT THE LEGISLATIVE INTENT, JUDICIAL CONSTRUCTION OR ADMINISTRATION AND IMPLEMENTATION OF ARTICLE XVI-W OF THE FISCAL CODE.(3) PARAGRAPH (2) DOES NOT APPLY TO THE ADDITION OF SECTION 1904-I OF THE TAX REFORM CODE OF 1971.Section 3 5. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1534PN1879 - 9 - <--12345678